es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Material para entrenar el equilibrio: Vigas de equilibrio; Tablas de equilibrio; Cojines de equilibrio; Almohadillas de equilibrio; Semiesferas de equilibrio; Steps de equilibrio; Discos deslizantes
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Tasapainoharjoitteluvälineet: Tasapainopuomit; Tasapainolaudat; Tasapainotyynyt; Tasapainolevyt; Tasapainosiilit; Tasapainoaskeleet; Liukukiekot
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Echipamente pentru echilibru: Bârne de echilibru; Plăci pentru echilibru; Pernițe pentru echilibru; Paduri pentru echilibru; Discuri de echilibru; Trepte pentru echilibru; Discuri de alunecare
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Инвентарь для тренировки равновесия: Балансировочные бревна; Балансборды; Балансировочные диски; Балансировочные подушки; Балансировочные полусферы; Балансировочные полусферы; Скользящие диски для фитнеса
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Equipamentos de treino de equilíbrio: Traves de equilíbrio; Tábuas de equilíbrio; Almofadas de equilíbrio; Almofadas para equilíbrio; Meias bolas de equilíbrio; Steps de equilíbrio; Discos deslizantes
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Balansetrenere: Balansebommer; Balansebrett; Balanseputer; Balansepads; Balanseputer; Balansetrinn; Skliskiver
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Balančné trenažéry: Gymnastické kladiny; Balančné dosky; Balančné vankúše; Balančné podložky; Balančné podložky; Balančné stepery; Posuvné disky na cvičenie
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Тренажори за баланс: Греди за баланс; Дъски за баланс; Възглавнички за баланс; Подложки за баланс; Балансиращи подложки; Стъпала за баланс; Плъзгащи се дискове
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Balancetrainer: Balancierbalken; Balance-Boards; Balance-Kissen; Balance-Pads; Balance-Pods; Balance-Steps; Gleitscheiben
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Attrezzi per l'allenamento dell'equilibrio: Travi di equilibrio; Tavole di equilibrio; Cuscini per equilibrio; Cuscinetti per equilibrio; Balance pod; Step per equilibrio; Dischi scorrevoli
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > อุปกรณ์ฝึกสมดุลร่างกาย: คานทรงตัว; กระดานฝึกสมดุล; จานฝึกสมดุล; แผ่นฝึกสมดุล; โดมฝึกทรงตัว; ที่เหยียบฝึกสมดุล; แผ่นสไลด์
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Balanční desky: Bilanční kladiny; Balance boardy; Balanční polštářky; Balanční podložky; Bilanční čočky; Balanční stupínky; Klouzavé disky
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 밸런스 트레이너: 밸런스 빔; 밸런스 보드; 밸런스 쿠션; 밸런스 패드; 밸런스 팟; 밸런스 스텝; 슬라이딩 디스크
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Máy tập thăng bằng: Cầu thăng bằng; Ván tập thăng bằng; Đệm tập thăng bằng; Miếng đệm thăng bằng; Gai thăng bằng; Bước thăng bằng; Đĩa trượt tập thể dục
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Balance Trainers: Balance Beams; Balance Boards; Balance Cushions; Balance Pads; Balance Pods; Balance Steps; Sliding Discs
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Balanstrainers: Evenwichtsbalken; Balansborden; Balanskussens; Balanspads; Balanspods; Balansstappen; Sliding discs
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening równowagi: Równoważnie; Deski balansujące; Poduszki do balansowania; Podkładki do balansowania; Półkule sensoryczne; Stopnie do balansowania; Dyski poślizgowe
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Balansträningsredskap: Balansbommar; Balansbrädor; Balanskuddar; Balansdynor; Balanskuddar; Balanssteg; Glidplattor
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Trenažeri za ravnotežu: Grede za ravnotežu; Ploče za ravnotežu; Jastuci za ravnotežu; Jastučići za ravnotežu; Podovi za ravnotežu; Kamenje za ravnotežu; Klizni diskovi
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > バランストレーニング用品: 平均台; バランスボード; バランスクッション; バランスパッド; バランスポッド; バランスステップ; スライディングディスク
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Egyensúlyedzők: Egyensúlyozó gerendák; Egyensúlytáblák; Egyensúlypárnák; Egyensúlybetétek; Egyensúlyozó párnák; Egyensúlylépők; Csúszókorongok
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Εξοπλισμός ισορροπίας: Δοκοί ισορροπίας; Σανίδες ισορροπίας; Μαξιλάρια ισορροπίας; Υποστηρίγματα ισορροπίας; Ημισφαίρια ισορροπίας; Εξοπλισμός εξισορρόπησης; Δίσκοι ολίσθησης
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Vadbene naprave za ravnotežje: Gredi; Ravnotežne plošče; Ravnotežne blazine; Podloge za ravnotežje; Blazine za ravnotežje; Stopnice za ravnotežje; Drsni diski
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Balancetrænere: Balancebomme; Balancebrætter; Balancepuder; Balancemåtter; Balancepuder; Balancetrin; Glideskiver
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Aparelhos para treinamento de equilíbrio: Traves de equilíbrio; Quadros de equilíbrio; Almofadas de equilíbrio; Blocos de equilíbrio; Mini discos de equilíbrio; Degraus de equilíbrio; Discos deslizantes
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Plateaux d’équilibre: Poutres d’équilibre; Planches d’équilibre; Coussins d’équilibre; Tapis d’équilibre; Coussins d’équilibre; Marches d’équilibre; Disques de glisse
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Denge Eğitim Aletleri: Denge aletleri; Denge Tahtaları; Denge Yastıkları; Denge Pedleri; Denge yastıkları; Denge Basamakları; Kayma diskleri
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Pusiausvyros treniruokliai: Pusiausvyros sijai; Pusiausvyros treniravimo lentos; Pusiausvyros treniravimo pagalvėlės; Pusiausvyros treniravimo padėklai; Pusiausvyros pagalvėlės; Pusiausvyros treniravimo laipteliai; Stumdomi diskai
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 平衡训练设备: 平衡木; 平衡板; 平衡垫; 平衡缓冲垫; 平衡触觉半球; 平衡台阶; 滑行盘
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 平衡訓練器材: 平衡木; 平衡板; 平衡墊; 平衡護墊; 平衡氣墊; 平衡階梯; 滑行盤